paice-husk-sbl-generator/paicehusk.sbl
		( ( 'ory' (test check) ) and (  (unset isIntact) (['ory'] delete) (insert '' ) (set canContinue) ) )
		or
		( ( 'ify' (test check) ) and (  (unset isIntact) (['ify'] delete) (insert '' ) (unset canContinue) ) )
		or
		( ( 'ncy' (test check) ) and (  (unset isIntact) (['cy'] delete) (insert 't' ) (set canContinue) ) )
		or
		( ( 'acy' (test check) ) and (  (unset isIntact) (['acy'] delete) (insert '' ) (set canContinue) ) )
		or
		( ( 'iz' (test check) ) and (  (unset isIntact) (['iz'] delete) (insert '' ) (set canContinue) ) )
		or
		( ( 'yz' (test check) ) and (  (unset isIntact) (['z'] delete) (insert 's' ) (unset canContinue) ) )
		or
		( ( 'dne' (test check) ) and (  (unset isIntact) ([''] delete) (insert '' ) (unset canContinue) ) )
		)
	)
)
define stem as (

    set canContinue
    set isIntact

    backwards (
        repeat rec
    )
)
